Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,106
Schoolhouse; use for public assemblies; rental.

The school board or board of education of any school district may in its discretion permit the use of public school buildings for public assemblages under such rules and regulations as it may adopt. The board may exact such rental as may be necessary to meet the expense of such meeting, restore the property, and pay for extra help required.

Laws 1915, c. 236, § 1, p. 553;

C.S.1922, § 6554;

C.S.1929, § 79-2130;

R.S.1943, § 79-2138;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 180, p. 751;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,142;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 752.